West Virginia, session 2026, SB432.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2.  Issuance of License, Expiration and Renewal for Homeless Youth. §17B-2-16. Identification documents for homeless youth United States citizens. (a) Findings.--The Legislature finds that:(1) Individuals who are homeless are often the victims of crimes in which their personal identification documents are stolen or lost;(2) Personal identification documents are necessary for obtaining employment or certain public benefits, but the fees for acquiring documents may be prohibitive to a homeless or unaccompanied homeless youth; and(3) Removing barriers that prevent homeless individuals who are U.S. citizens from obtaining identification documents may enable those individuals to achieve greater financial stability and a permanent home.(b) Definitions.--  For the purposes of this section:(1) "Homeless U.S. citizen" means an individual who meets the following criteria:(A) The individual is: (i) a United States citizen; and (ii) a resident of this state, as defined by §17A-3-1a of this code, and(1) Lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence;(2) Has a primary nighttime residence that is a place not ordinarily used as a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings; or(3) Is living in a homeless shelter or served by a homeless services provider.(B) The individual has a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings.(2) "Homeless shelter" means a homeless service agency or entity which regularly provides temporary residence for homeless individuals and families. (3) "Homeless services provider" means any government or nonprofit agency that provides a homeless shelter, housing assistance program, or homeless outreach or advocacy program, a local education agency homeless liaison, school counselor or school nurse, or a social worker licensed in the state. (4) "U.S. Citizen" means a person who is either: (i) native-born while lawfully present within the territorial limits of the United States; (ii) foreign-born to a U.S. citizen parent or U.S. citizen parents; or (iii) or duly naturalized after completion of all necessary requirements of the legal processes for obtaining such status. (c) A Homeless U.S. citizen is eligible to receive certain identification documents at no cost to the Homeless U.S. citizen, as provided in subsection (d) of this section, if all of the following criteria apply:(1) The Homeless U.S. citizen currently resides at a homeless shelter or is served by a homeless youth services provider in this state;(2) The Homeless U.S. citizen uses the address of the homeless shelter or homeless youth services provider as his or her address of residence on the application for the identifying document; and(3) An employee or representative from the homeless shelter signs an affidavit stating that the Homeless U.S. citizen is truly a resident of the homeless shelter or is served by a homeless youth services provider and has no other known or fixed, regular address and has no other known address; and(4) The State Registrar can confirm the applicant’s U.S. citizenship by confirming the existence for such person of at least one of the four categories of documents approved by U.S. immigration services that can be used for proof of citizenship, which are: (i) a valid birth certificate issued by the state where the applicant was born; (ii) a valid U.S. passport; (iii) a valid certificate of U.S. citizenship; or (iv) a valid naturalization certificate. (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the division shall issue the following documents to a Homeless U.S. citizen, meeting the eligibility criteria provided in subsection (c) of this section, at no cost to the citizen:(1) A photo identification card; (2) A replacement driver’s license; or(3) A replacement birth certificate, subject to the State Registrar’s confirmation of the applicant’s U.S. citizenship: Provided, That the division may not issue more than one identifying document, pursuant to this section, to any particular individual within one 30-day period.(e) The commissioner shall develop forms necessary to carry out the requirements of this section.